src/braille/thirdparty/liblouis/tables/da-dk-g26_1993.ctb
word kan 13
word kommer 13-156
word ker =
word kommet 13-346
word ket =
word komme 13-146
word kme =
word kom 13-134
begnum km 6-13-134
contraction km
word kunne 13-1246
word kne =

word ligesom 123-234
begnum ls 6-123-234
contraction ls
word lige 123
word lille 123-123
begnum ll 6-123-123
contraction ll

word mange 134-12456
word mge =
word med 134
word megen 146-126
word meen =
word meget 146-346
word meet =
word mellem 146-134
word mem =
word men 146
word me =
word min 134-1345
begnum mn 6-134-1345
contraction mn
word mit 134-2345
begnum mt 6-145-2345
contraction mt
word måske 134-123456
word msk =
word måtte 134-1256
word mte =

word naturligvis 1345-2345-1236
begnum ntv 6-1345-2345-1236
contraction ntv
word nd =
word ned 1246
word ne =
word nogen 1345-1345
begnum nn 6-1345-1345
contraction nn
word noget 1345-2345
begnum nt 6-1345-2345
contraction nt
word nogle 1345-123-15
begnum nle 6-1345-123-15
contraction nle
word når 1345

word også 14-16
begnum cå 6-14-16
contraction cå
word og 14
word omkring 135-134-13
begnum omk 6-135-134-13
contraction omk
word op 135
word or =
word over 1346

word på 1234

word ret 12356
word re 1235-15
word rigtige 1235-12456
word rge =
word rigtigt 1235-2345
begnum rt 6-1235-2345
contraction rt
word rigtig 1235

word sagde 234-1456
word sammen 234-134
begnum sm 6-234-134
contraction sm
word samme 234-146
word sme =
word selvfølgelig 234-1236-124
begnum svf 6-234-1236-124
contraction svf
word selv 234-1236
begnum sv 6-234-1236
contraction sv
word sidste 234-1356-15
word sste =
word sidst 234-1356
word sst =
word sin 234-1345
begnum sn 6-234-1345
contraction sn
word sit 234-2345
begnum st 6-234-2345
contraction st
word skal 123456
word sk =
word skulle 123456-123-15
word skle =
word snart 234-1235
begnum sr 6-234-1235
contraction sr
word som 234
word sådan 16-1
begnum åa 6-16-1
contraction åa
word således 16-15
begnum åe 6-16-15
contraction åe
word så 16

word tid 2345-145
begnum td 6-2345-145
contraction td
word tilbage 2345-12
begnum tb 6-2345-12
contraction tb
word til 2345

word under 12345

sufword var- =
sufword var. =
word var 36
word ve 3456
word ved 1236
word ville 1236-123-15
begnum vle 6-1236-123-15
contraction vle
word vil 1236-123
begnum vl 6-1236-123
contraction vl
word været 1236-2345
begnum vt 6-1236-2345
contraction vt
word være 345

#Part words
nocross always den 12346
nocross always der 23456
nocross always det 2346
nocross always de 1456
nocross always en 126
nocross always er 156
nocross always et 346
nocross always ge 12456
#nocross always hvor 34
nocross always hv 2456
nocross always ig 35
nocross always me 146
nocross always nd 12345
nocross always ne 1246
nocross always or 1346
nocross always re 12356
nocross always sk 123456
nocross always st 1356
nocross always te 1256

# Numsign/"ve", special case when back-translating
noback nocross always ve 3456

# Additional words containing "hvor"
# these are made explicit in 6-dots to handle / better

word hvoraf 34-1-124
word hvorfra 34-124-1235-1
word hvorhen 34-125-126
word hvorhenne 34-125-126-1246
word hvori 34-24
word hvoriblandt 34-24-12-123-1-12345-2345
word hvorimellem 34-24-146-123-123-15-134
word hvorimod 34-24-134-135-145
word hvorlænge 34-123-345-1345-12456
word hvormange 34-134-1-1345-12456
word hvorom 34-135-134
word hvormeget 34-146-1245-346
word hvorudfra 34-136-145-124-1235-1
word hvorvidt 34-1236-24-145-2345
word ihvorvel 24-34-3456-123

# Rules and corrections for back-translation

#ve special case
nofor midendword ve 3456

# nondigletters covers small letters from k + various part word contractions with dots 5 or 6. Necesary to ensure correct back-translation.
attribute nondigletter klmnopqrstuvwxyzæøå\x017e\x00e0\x00e7\x00e8\x00e9\x00ea\x00eb\x00ee\x00ef\x00f4\x00f9\x00fb\x00fc\x283f\x2829\x282b\x2837
nofor before nondigletter begword ve 3456
nofor before nondigletter begword vea 3456-1
nofor sufword veade 3456-1-1456
nofor sufword veader 3456-1-23456
nofor sufword veage 3456-1-12456
nofor before nondigletter begword veag 3456-1-1245

# veb
nofor before nondigletter begword veb 3456-12
nofor before nondigletter begword veba 3456-12-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vebb 3456-12-12
nofor sufword vebbest 3456-12-12-15-1356
nofor before nondigletter begword vebe 3456-12-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vebi 3456-12-24

# vec
nofor before nondigletter begword vec 3456-14
nofor before nondigletter begword vecchi 3456-14-14-125-24

# ved
nofor before nondigletter begword ved 3456-145
nofor before nondigletter begword veda 3456-145-1
nofor sufword vedaer 3456-145-1-156
nofor before nondigletter begword vedb 3456-145-12
nofor sufword vedben 3456-145-12-126
nofor sufword vedbend 3456-145-12-15-12345
nofor sufword vedbenden 3456-145-12-126-12346
nofor before nondigletter begword vedc 3456-145-14
nofor before nondigletter begword vedd 3456-145-145
nofor before nondigletter begword vedda 3456-145-145-1
nofor sufword vedde 3456-145-1456
nofor sufword veddet 3456-145-2346
nofor sufword vede 3456-1456
nofor sufword veden 3456-12346
nofor sufword veder 3456-23456
nofor sufword vedet 3456-2346
nofor before nondigletter begword vedf 3456-145-124
nofor before nondigletter begword vedfa 3456-145-124-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vedfe 3456-145-124-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vedfi 3456-145-124-24
nofor before nondigletter begword vedg 3456-145-1245
nofor before nondigletter begword vedga 3456-145-1245-1
nofor sufword vedge 3456-145-12456
nofor before nondigletter begword vedgi 3456-145-1245-24
nofor before nondigletter begword vedh 3456-145-125
nofor before nondigletter begword vedha 3456-145-125-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vedhe 3456-145-125-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vedhef 3456-145-125-15-124
nofor sufword vedhefte 3456-145-125-15-124-1256
nofor before nondigletter begword vedhi 3456-145-125-24
nofor before nondigletter begword vedi 3456-145-24
nofor before nondigletter begword vedj 3456-145-245
nofor sufword vedst 3456-145-1356
nofor sufword vedte 3456-145-1256

# vee
nofor before nondigletter begword vee 3456-15
nofor before nondigletter begword veeb 3456-15-12
nofor sufword veen 3456-126
nofor sufword veer 3456-156
nofor sufword veet 3456-346

# vef
nofor before nondigletter begword vef 3456-124
nofor before nondigletter begword vefa 3456-124-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vefe 3456-124-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vefi 3456-124-24

# veg
nofor before nondigletter begword veg 3456-1245
nofor before nondigletter begword vega 3456-1245-1
nofor sufword vege 3456-12456
nofor sufword vegen 3456-1245-126
nofor word veget 3456-1245-346
nofor sufword vegger 3456-1245-1245-156
nofor before nondigletter begword vegi 3456-1245-24
nofor sufword vegst 3456-1245-1356

# veh
nofor before nondigletter begword veh 3456-125
nofor before nondigletter begword veha 3456-125-1
nofor sufword vehand 3456-125-1-12345
nofor sufword vehage 3456-125-1-23456
nofor before nondigletter begword vehe 3456-125-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vehi 3456-125-24

# vei
nofor before nondigletter begword vei 3456-24
nofor before nondigletter begword veibe 3456-24-12-15
nofor sufword veide 3456-24-1456
nofor sufword veien 3456-24-126
nofor sufword veige 3456-24-12456
nofor before nondigletter begword veij 3456-24-245
nofor sufword veind 3456-24-12345

# vej
nofor before nondigletter begword vej 3456-245
nofor before nondigletter begword veja 3456-245-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vejadga 3456-245-1-145-1245-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vejaf 3456-245-1-124
nofor sufword vejafde 3456-245-1-124-1456
nofor before nondigletter begword vejafgif 3456-245-1-124-1245-24-124
nofor before nondigletter begword vejb 3456-245-12
nofor before nondigletter begword vejba 3456-245-12-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vejbe 3456-245-12-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vejbi 3456-245-12-24
nofor before nondigletter begword vejbid 3456-245-12-24-145
nofor before nondigletter begword vejc 3456-245-14
nofor before nondigletter begword vejd 3456-245-145
nofor before nondigletter begword vejda 3456-245-145-1
nofor sufword vejde 3456-245-1456
nofor before nondigletter begword vejdi 3456-245-145-24
nofor before nondigletter begword veje 3456-245-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vejea 3456-245-15-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vejeb 3456-245-15-12
nofor before nondigletter begword vejed 3456-245-15-145
nofor before nondigletter begword vejeda 3456-245-15-145-1
nofor sufword vejede 3456-245-15-1456
nofor before nondigletter begword vejef 3456-245-15-124
nofor before nondigletter begword vejeg 3456-245-15-1245
nofor sufword vejege 3456-245-15-12456
nofor sufword vejen 3456-245-126
nofor sufword vejene 3456-245-15-1246
nofor sufword vejer 3456-245-156
nofor word vejet 3456-245-346
nofor before nondigletter begword vejf 3456-245-124
nofor before nondigletter begword vejfa 3456-245-124-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vejfe 3456-245-124-15
nofor sufword vejfest 3456-245-124-15-1356
nofor before nondigletter begword vejfi 3456-245-124-24
nofor begword vejfor 3456-245-124-1346
nofor before nondigletter begword vejg 3456-245-1245
nofor before nondigletter begword vejga 3456-245-1245-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vejgaa 3456-245-1245-1-1
nofor sufword vejge 3456-245-12456
nofor before nondigletter begword vejgi 3456-245-1245-24
nofor before nondigletter begword vejh 3456-245-125
nofor before nondigletter begword vejha 3456-245-125-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vejhe 3456-245-125-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vejhi 3456-245-125-24
nofor sufword vejhist 3456-245-125-24-1356
nofor before nondigletter begword vejhj 3456-245-125-245
nofor before nondigletter begword veji 3456-245-24
nofor before nondigletter begword vejid 3456-245-24-145
nofor before nondigletter begword vejj 3456-245-245
nofor before nondigletter begword vejja 3456-245-245-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vejje 3456-245-245-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vejji 3456-245-245-24
nofor sufword vejor 3456-245-1346
nofor begword vejst 3456-245-1356

nofor always vend 3456-12345
nofor always veor 3456-1346
nofor always vest 3456-1356
nofor always vete 3456-1256

# Corrections of letters with accents
nofor sufword aïda 1-5-24-145-1
nofor sufword anaïs 1-1345-1-5-24-234
nofor sufword barsebäck 12-1-1235-234-15-12-345-14-13
nofor sufword bohè 12-135-125-5-15
nofor sufword château 14-125-5-1-1256-1-136
nofor sufword citroën 14-24-2345-1235-135-5-15-1345
nofor sufword däniken 145-345-1345-24-13-126
nofor word fór 124-5-135-1235
nofor sufword göran 1245-246-1235-1-1345
nofor sufword göring 1245-246-1235-24-1345-1245
nofor word händel 125-345-1345-1456-123
nofor word händels 125-345-1345-1456-123-234
nofor sufword lagerlöf 123-1-1245-156-123-246-124
nofor sufword márquez 134-5-1-1235-6-12345-136-15-6-1356
nofor sufword miró 134-24-1235-5-135
nofor sufword moliè 134-135-123-24-5-15
nofor sufword norröna 1345-1346-1235-246-1345-1
nofor sufword tannhäus 2345-1-1345-1345-125-345-136-234
nofor sufword tórshavn 2345-5-135-1235-234-125-1-1236-1345
 nofor sufword václav 1236-5-1-14-123-1-1236
nofor sufword verän 1236-156-345-1345
nofor sufword weizsäck 6-2456-15-24-6-1356-234-345-14-13

# Common combinations of one word contractions with slash
word af/på 356-34-1234
word du/i 145-34-24
word eller/og 15-34-14
word fra/til 235-34-2345
word han/hun 13456-34-136
word hun/han 136-34-13456
word i/du 24-34-145
word og/eller 14-34-15
word over/under 1346-34-12345
word på/af 1234-34-356
word til/fra 2345-34-235
word under/over 12345-34-1346

# no backtrans of ^1 and `2. use contractions
nofor always eta 346-1
nofor always etb 346-12
always etc 346-14

# Ensure no one-letter word contraction before or after a dash
